California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) The board shall adopt district forest practice rules and regulations for each district in accordance with the policies set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 4511) of this chapter and pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code to ensure the continuous growing and harvesting of commercial forest tree species and to protect the soil, air, fish, wildlife, and water resources, including, but not limited to, streams, lakes, and estuaries.

(b) (1) The board shall ensure that its
 rules and regulations that govern the harvesting of commercial tree species, where applicable, consider the capacity of forest resources, including above ground and below ground biomass and soil, to sequester carbon dioxide emissions sufficient to meet or exceed the state’s greenhouse gas reduction requirements for the forestry sector, consistent with the scoping plan adopted by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code).

(2) The costs of the contracts for research studies or technical analyses initiated by the board or the department to comply with paragraph (1) shall be funded, upon appropriation by the Legislature, from fee revenues collected pursuant to Section 38597 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 534, Sec. 4.   (AB 1504)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4551.3.

(a) A sustained yield plan that is prepared and approved in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board pursuant to Section 4551, including Article 6.75 (commencing with Section 1091.1) of Subchapter 7 of Chapter 4 of Division 1.5 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, shall be effective for a period of no more than 20 years.

(b) As part of the continuing monitoring process for an approved sustained yield plan, as described in subdivision (a), the department shall hold a public hearing on the plan if requested by an interested party who submits, in writing, a request based on substantial evidence of potential noncompliance with any of the following:

(1) The terms and conditions of the original sustained yield plan approval.

(2) The applicable rules or regulations adopted by the board that were in effect on the date the sustained yield plan was originally approved.

(3) Other requirements that have been imposed on the sustained yield plan by operation of law.

(c) The request shall identify specific issues in the sustained yield plan to be addressed at the public hearing. To be considered, a request shall be made to the department within six months after the midpoint of the effective term of a sustained yield plan described in subdivision (a). The department shall hold the public hearing within 120 days after the date of the close of the six-month request period. A sustained yield plan shall be effective
 for the remainder of its term unless the director makes written findings, based on a preponderance of evidence, that implementation of the sustained yield plan is not in compliance with any material provision of paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (b).

(d) If a public hearing is required, the director shall provide at least 30 days’ notice to the sustained yield plan submitter and the public and shall provide for a record of the hearing, pursuant to regulations adopted by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 108, Sec. 1.   (AB 1160)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4551.5.

Rules and regulations shall apply to the conduct of timber operations and shall include, but shall not be limited to, measures for fire prevention and control, for soil erosion control, for site preparation that involves disturbance of soil or burning of vegetation following timber harvesting activities, for water quality and watershed control, for flood control, for stocking, for protection against timber operations that unnecessarily destroy young timber growth or timber productivity of the soil, for prevention and control of damage by forest insects, pests, and disease, for the protection of natural and scenic qualities in special treatment areas identified pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 30417, and for the preparation of timber harvesting plans. In developing these rules, the board shall solicit and consider recommendations from the
 department, recommendations from the Department of Fish and Game relating to the protection of fish and wildlife, recommendations from the State Water Resources Control Board and the California regional water quality control boards relating to water quality, recommendations from the State Air Resources Board and local air pollution control districts relating to air pollution control, and recommendations of the California Coastal Commission relating to the protection of natural and scenic coastal zone resources in special treatment areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 146.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4551.7.

The board shall, on or before November 1, 1988, adopt regulations pertaining to site preparation that involves disturbance of soil or burning of vegetation following timber harvesting activities conducted after January 1, 1988.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 987, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4551.9.

(a) On or before January 1, 2005, the board shall adopt regulations to require that a timber harvesting plan include a map or maps, depicting the location and boundaries of past, present, and reasonably foreseeable probable future projects, as defined in Section 21065 and Section 895.1 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, on land owned or controlled by the applicant in the planning watershed. The board may not require an applicant to furnish maps of projects completed more than 10 years prior to the submission of the timber harvesting plan. Maps shall include silvicultural prescription. The scale and format of maps provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be determined by the board. This subdivision may not be construed to require disclosure of proprietary information to the public.

(b) The board shall consider the impact of the regulations on smaller landowners, and avoid excessive burdens or costs on those landowners.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 816, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4552.

The rules and regulations adopted by the board shall be based upon a study of the factors that significantly affect the present and future condition of timberlands and shall be used as standards by persons preparing timber harvesting plans. In those instances in which the board intends the director to exercise professional judgment in applying any rule, regulation, or provision of this chapter, the board shall include in its rules standards to guide the actions of the director, and the director shall conform to such standards, consistent with Section 710.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 930.)
-------------------------------------------

4553.

The rules and regulations shall be continuously reviewed and may be revised. During the formulation or revision of the rules and regulations, the board shall consult with, and carefully evaluate the recommendations of, the department, concerned federal, state, and local agencies, educational institutions, civic and public interest organizations, and private organizations and individuals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 584, Sec. 20.   (AB 1414)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4554.

Except for emergency regulations or orders of repeal adopted pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the board shall not adopt or revise rules, regulations, or resource conservation standards unless a public hearing is first held respecting their adoption or revision. At least 30 days prior to the hearing, the board shall give notice of the hearing by publication pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 355.)
-------------------------------------------

4554.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 11343.4 of the Government Code, except as specified in subdivision (b), rules and regulations adopted or revised pursuant to this chapter shall become effective on the next January 1 that is not less than 30 days from the date of approval of those rules or regulations by the Office of Administrative Law.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if the board adopts emergency regulations pursuant to Section 4555, and subsequently adopts those emergency regulations as nonemergency rules or regulations pursuant to this chapter, the rules or regulations shall become effective 30 days from the date of approval of the rules or regulations by the Office of Administrative Law.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2001.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 582, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Section operative January 1, 2001, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4555.

If the director determines that a substantial question exists concerning whether the intent of this chapter is currently provided for by the rules and regulations of the board, and that approval of a timber harvesting plan which has been filed could result in immediate, significant, and long-term harm to the natural resources of the state, the director may withhold decision on a timber harvesting plan. However, within five days of that action, the director shall notify the board of that action. Within 30 days of the receipt of the notice, the board shall, after a public hearing, make a determination as to whether or not the intent of this chapter has been provided for in the rules and regulations of the board. The determination shall be conclusive.

If the board finds that the intent of this chapter has not been provided for in the rules and regulations, the board shall act to amend the rules by emergency regulation in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The director shall act upon the plan within 15 days of the board’s action. Emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall be effective for not more than 120 days. The regulations may be made permanent if the board acts to adopt or revise its rules and regulations pursuant to procedures established in this article for the adoption of other than emergency regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 738, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Resource Conservation Standards [4561. - 4562.9.]

4561.

It is the purpose of this section to set forth resource conservation standards for timber operations, and to ensure that a cover of trees of commercial species, sufficient to utilize adequately the suitable and available growing space, is maintained or established after timber operations.

To that end, the following resource conservation standards define minimum acceptable stocking, and an area covered by a timber harvesting plan shall be classified as acceptably stocked if either of the following conditions exist within five years after completion of timber operations:

(a) The area contains an average point count of 300 per acre, except that in areas that the registered professional forester who prepares the timber harvesting plan has determined
 are site IV classification or lower, the minimum average point count shall be 150 per acre. Point count shall be computed as follows:

(1) A countable tree that is not more than four inches in diameter at breast height to count as one.

(2) A countable tree over 4 inches and not more than 12 inches in diameter at breast height to count as three.

(3) A countable tree over 12 inches in diameter at breast height to count as six.

(b) (1) The average residual basal area, measured in stems one inch or larger in diameter is at least 85 square feet per acre, except that in areas that the registered professional forester who prepares the timber harvesting plan has determined are site II classification or lower, the minimum average residual
 basal area shall be 50 square feet per acre.

(2) The board, on a finding that it is in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter, may encourage selection, shelterwood, or other types of management of timber if consistent with the biological requirements of the tree species and may regulate the size and shape of areas in which even-age management of timber is utilized.

(3) Rock outcroppings and other areas not normally bearing timber shall not be considered as requiring stocking and are exempt from the stocking provisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 147.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4561.1.

The resource conservation standards relating to stocking enumerated in Section 4561 shall constitute minimum requirements, and these shall be the standards to which all timber harvesting plans shall conform unless the board adopts higher stocking standards for each district. The board shall adopt standards for each district, after a public hearing, which are equal to or stricter than the standards of this chapter and shall report such standards to the Legislature.

It is not the intent of the Legislature in designating minimum standards that such standards shall be deemed to be preferred as the standards to be adopted by the board. The board may, by a majority vote as provided in Section 736, adopt higher minimum standards of stocking if, in the opinion of the board, growing conditions, tree species, site quality, or other factors justify such stricter standards and if such action is consistent with the purposes of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4561.2.

Notwithstanding Section 4561.1 or the resource conservation standards relating to stocking pursuant to Section 4561, the board may adopt alternative stocking standards that meet the purposes of Section 4561 if those alternative standards reasonably address the variables in forest characteristics, achieve suitable resource conservation, and
 contribute to specific forest health and ecological goals as defined by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 182, Sec. 1.   (AB 417)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4561.5.

The board may from time to time, after a public hearing, amend permanent stocking standards applicable to commercial timberland where the growing timber does not meet the acceptable stocking standards as enumerated in Section 4561.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 383, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

4561.7.

(a) The site designated for testing purposes by subdivision (b) is exempt from any stocking requirements.

(b) Testing may be permitted only on a 35-acre area located in the Pudding Creek drainage of Mendocino County in Sections 19 and 30, T19N, R16W, M.D.B. & M.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1270 [Sec. 2].   Effective September 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

4562.

In order to reduce the incidence and spread of fire on timberlands, the board shall adopt rules in the fire protection zone as such zone is defined by the board, including, but not limited to, land along either side of the rights-of-way along public roads in widths to be determined by rule by the board in various areas, and in such other areas as the board deems necessary, to govern the disposal of solid nonforest wastes and slash created by timber operations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 880.)
-------------------------------------------

4562.5.

It is the purpose of this section to insure that soil erosion associated with timber operations is adequately controlled to protect soil resources, forest productivity, and water quality. The prevention, retardation, and control of accelerated erosion are the principal goals of this section. The board shall promulgate regulations for each district to govern timber operations that may cause significant soil disturbance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 164.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

4562.7.

The purpose of this section is to ensure the protection of beneficial uses that are derived from the physical form, water quality, and biological capability of streams. To these ends, in addition to the rules provided for in Section 4551.5, the board shall adopt rules for control of timber operations that will result or threaten to result in unreasonable effects on the beneficial uses of the waters of the state. The rules shall include rules for:

(a) The disposal of petroleum products, sanitary wastes, refuse, and cleaning agents in proper dumps or waste treatment facilities to prevent them from entering streams.

(b) Construction of logging
 road and tractor trail stream crossings to assure substantially unimpaired flow of water and to assure free passage of fish both upstream and downstream.

(c) Minimizing damage to unmerchantable streamside vegetation, particularly hardwood trees.

(d) Minimizing damage to streambeds or banks resulting from skidding or hauling logs through, across, or into streams, by operating tractors or other heavy equipment in or near streambeds, or by construction of log landings or logging roads in or near the channels of streams.

(e) Control of slash, debris, fill, and side cast earth, resulting from timber operations, which may be carried into streams.

(f) Minimizing the effects of erosion on watercourses and lakes by both of the following:

(1) Installation and maintenance of drainage facilities and soil stabilization treatments as required on timber operations.

(2) Planned abandonment of roads and landings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 584, Sec. 24.   (AB 1414)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4562.9.

The board shall adopt regulations requiring maintenance of installed drainage facilities and soil stabilization treatments on skid trails, roads, and landings for a period of at least one year, but not to exceed three years, after filing of the work completion report, if the report is approved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 153, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Licenses [4570. - 4578.]

4570.

For purposes of this article, “real person in interest” means an individual who is one of the following:

(a) The sole proprietor, principal owner, or principal officer of an entity that is applying for a license or the renewal of a license under this article.

(b) The on-site supervisor responsible for the conduct of timber operations pursuant to the license, including the authority to hire and fire persons conducting those timber operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 740, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4571.

(a) No person shall engage in timber operations until that person has obtained a license from the board.

(b) The board may issue a limited timber operator license for the commercial cutting or removal of Christmas trees, tanbark, fuelwood, root crown burls, posts, or split products.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 740, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4572.

(a) The board shall, by regulation, prescribe the form and content of an application for a timber operator license or license renewal, establish procedures for filing the application, and require a reasonable filing fee. The amount of the filing fee shall not exceed the amount necessary to administer licensing under this article.

(b) First-time applicants for a timber operator license shall furnish to the board proof that the real person in interest has complied with both of the following requirements:

(1) Completion, within the preceding 12 months, of an education program approved by the director that covers the statutes and regulations governing timber operations in this state.

(2) (A) Except as specified in subparagraph (B) and subdivision (d), completion of 3000 hours of work experience in two or more areas of employment in timber operations.

(B) An applicant shall be exempt from this paragraph if the applicant furnishes proof to the board that the applicant is sole proprietor of, principal owner of, or principal officer of an entity that owns, the land on which all timber operations under the license will be conducted, and the applicant will supervise those timber operations.

(c) (1) Except as specified in paragraph (2) and subdivision (d), all applicants shall file with the director written evidence of timber operation insurance coverage under an insurance policy issued by an insurer eligible to do business in this state that includes both of the following:

(A) Commercial general liability insurance for not less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) per occurrence for bodily injury and property damage combined, including within that limit, or in a separate limit, loggers third party property damage liability.

(B) A provision requiring the insurer to provide to the director a certificate of insurance and notice of any amendment to, or cancellation of, the policy within 30 days from the date of policy amendment or cancellation.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to an applicant who owns the land upon which the timber operations are to be conducted pursuant to the license.

(d) Subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) do not apply to an applicant for a limited timber operator license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 740, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4573.

The board may deny a timber operator license for any of the following reasons:

(a) The applicant is not the real person in interest.

(b) Material misrepresentation or false statement in the application.

(c) Conviction within one year of the application of unlawfully operating without a license.

(d) The failure or refusal of the applicant to comply with this chapter or the rules and regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this chapter, within three years prior to the date of application.

(e) The failure or refusal of the applicant to pay a judgment assessed or awarded by a court of competent jurisdiction that is the result of a violation of this chapter or the rules and regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this chapter.

(f) The failure or refusal of the applicant to keep current the insurance required by subdivision (c) of Section 4572.

(g) The failure or refusal of the applicant to reimburse the department for costs incurred by the department as the result of an action to correct a violation conducted in accordance with Article 8 (commencing with Section 4601).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 740, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4574.

(a) Timber operator licenses shall be valid for a period not to exceed two calendar years, as prescribed by the board.

(b) (1) The board may deny an application for license renewal until any violations by the applicant that exist on the date of submission of the renewal application, of which the applicant has been notified and given reasonable opportunity to correct, are corrected in accordance with any reasonable terms and conditions required by the board.

(2) The board may issue a temporary license to permit the applicant to perform those timber operations that are necessary to correct any violation that has resulted in a denial of license renewal.

(c) For a license first issued on or after January 1, 1997, the board may deny an application for license renewal if the real person in interest has not completed both an education program approved by the director that covers the statutes and regulations governing timber operations in this state, and 3,000 hours of work experience in two or more areas of employment in timber operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 740, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4575.

A license is subject to future legislation and is not transferable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

4576.

A license may be suspended or revoked by the director pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code for any of the reasons specified by Section 4573, for refusal to allow inspections, or for violations of any of the rules and regulations of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

4576.1.

During the period for which a timber operator license has been suspended, revoked, or denied pursuant to Section 4573 or 4576, the real person in interest, as defined in Section 4570, may not have any ownership, possessory, security, or other pecuniary interest in, or any responsibility for the conduct of, the timber operations of any person licensed pursuant to this article. This provision does not preclude ownership of publicly traded stock in any corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 171, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4577.

The board may delegate its authority under this article to the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

4578.

Timber operations, timber harvesting, and any other activities pursuant to a timber harvest plan or a federal or state timber sales contract are exempt from the provisions of Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, and no license shall be required for the conduct of timber operations on private or public lands, other than as provided in Section 4571.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 710, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Timber Harvesting [4581. - 4592.5.]

4581.

No person shall conduct timber operations unless a timber harvesting plan prepared by a registered professional forester has been submitted for such operations to the department pursuant to this article. Such plan shall be required in addition to the license required in Section 4571.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4582.

The timber harvesting plan shall be filed with the department in writing by a person who owns, leases, or otherwise controls or operates on all or any portion of any timberland and who plans to harvest the timber on the timberland. If the person who files the timber harvesting plan is not the owner of the timberland, the person filing the plan shall notify the timberland owner by certified mail that the plan has been submitted and shall certify that mailing to the department. The timber harvesting plan shall be a public record and shall include all of the following information:

(a) The name and address of the timber owner.

(b) The name and address of the timber operator if known at the time of filing. If the timber operator is not known at the time of filing, the plan submitter shall notify the department as soon as the timber operator is known, but in any case before timber operations begin.

(c) A description of the land on which the work is proposed to be done, including a United States Geological Survey quadrangle map or equivalent indicating the location of all streams, the location of all proposed and existing logging truck roads, and indicating boundaries of all site I classification timberlands to be stocked in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 4561 and any other site classifications if the board establishes specific minimum stocking standards for other site classifications.

(d) A description of the silvicultural methods to be applied, including the type of logging equipment to be used.

(e) An outline of the methods to be used to avoid excessive accelerated erosion from timber operations to be conducted within the proximity of a stream.

(f) Special provisions, if any, to protect any unique area within the area of timber operations.

(g) The expected dates of commencement and completion of timber operations.

(h) A certification by the registered professional forester preparing the plan that the registered professional forester or a designee has personally inspected the plan area.

(i) Any other information the board provides by regulation to meet its rules and the standards of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 79.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4582.3.

The board shall, on or before May 1, 1985, adopt regulations regarding notice of intent to harvest timber, to be given within two working days following submission of a timber harvesting plan, which it determines to be appropriate and which are consistent with law and Horn v. County of Ventura, 24 Cal. 3d 605. In adopting the regulations, the board shall take account of the extent of the administrative burden involved in giving the notice. The method of notice shall include, but not be limited to, mailed notice. The regulations may require the person submitting the timber harvesting plan to provide to the department a list of the names and addresses of persons to whom the notice was mailed and a written declaration that the mailing has been completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1508, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4582.4.

Notice of the filing of timber harvesting plans shall be made by the department to any person who requests, in writing, such notification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1300.)
-------------------------------------------

4582.5.

Timber harvesting plans shall be applicable to a specific piece of property or properties and shall be based upon such characteristics of the property as vegetation type, soil stability, topography, geology, climate, and stream characteristics.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 880.)
-------------------------------------------

4582.6.

(a) Upon receipt of the timber harvesting plan, the department shall place it, or a true copy of the plan, in a file available for public inspection in the county in which timber operations are proposed under the plan, and, for the purpose of interdisciplinary review, shall transmit a copy to the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the appropriate California regional water quality control board, the county planning agency, and, if the area is within its jurisdiction, the Tahoe Regional Planning Agency, as the case may be. The department shall invite, consider, and respond in writing to comments received from public agencies to which the plan has been transmitted and shall consult with those agencies at
 their request.

(b) Within the public comment period, any responsible agency, as defined in Section 21069, shall provide the department with specific comments or recommendations, or both, on any significant environmental issues and proposed mitigation measures raised by the timber harvesting plan. The responsible agency shall also identify its statutory authority for any requests for mitigation measures that it may determine to be necessary. If the responsible agency fails to respond by the end of the public comment period, the department may assume that the responsible agency has no comments or recommendations concerning the timber harvesting plan, but the failure of the responsible agency to make comments or recommendations shall not be used as the basis for a determination or presumption that the timber harvesting plan will have
 no significant effect on the environment. The department shall consider all comments and recommendations received from responsible agencies and from the public during the public comment period. If a responsible agency fails to respond within the public comment period, it may request additional time to respond. The director may grant an extension of the time to respond of up to 14 calendar days if the director determines, after consultation with the person submitting the timber harvesting plan, that an extension is necessary.

(c) To ensure that all public comments and concerns are considered by the department, each responsible agency shall maintain a list of written information it disseminates on the timber harvesting plan under review prior to the close of the public comment period.

(d) On and after July 1, 1983, the board of supervisors or planning commission of a county for which rules have been adopted pursuant to Section 4516.5 may request a public hearing on a timber harvesting plan submitted for lands within the county, and the department shall hold a hearing for the purpose of public comment, if requested, prior to taking any action on the timber harvesting plan pursuant to Section 4582.7. The hearing shall be held in the county in which the proposed harvest is located at a time and place convenient to the public. The hearing shall be held in county offices if made available by the county for that purpose. The chairperson of the hearing shall be a representative of the department, shall receive both oral and written testimony from members of the public, local government officials, persons submitting the plans, and others, and shall provide for the hearing to
 be electronically recorded. The department shall prepare and make available written responses to significant issues raised at the hearing. This subdivision does not extend the time within which an action is required to be taken pursuant to Section 4582.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 80.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4582.7.

(a) The director shall have 30 days from the date that the initial inspection is completed (10 of these days shall follow the date of final interagency review) or, if the director determines that the inspection need not be made, 15 days from the date of filing, as specified in Section 4604, or a longer period mutually agreed upon by the director and the person submitting the timber harvesting plan, to review the plan and take public comments. After the final review and public comment period has ended, the director shall have up to 15 working days, or a longer period mutually agreed upon by the director and the person submitting the timber harvesting plan, to review the public input, to consider recommendations
 and mitigation measures of other agencies, to respond in writing to the issues raised, and to determine if the plan is in conformance with the rules and regulations of the board and with this chapter.

(b) If the director determines that the timber harvesting plan is not in conformance with the rules and regulations of the board or with this chapter, the director shall return the plan, stating the director’s reasons in writing, and advising the person submitting the plan of the person’s right to a hearing before the board, and timber operations may not commence.

(c) A person to whom a timber harvesting plan is returned may, within 10 days from the date of receipt of the plan, request of the board a public hearing before the board. The board shall schedule a public hearing to
 review the timber harvesting plan to determine if the plan is in conformance with the rules and regulations of the board and with this chapter. Timber operations shall await board approval of the timber harvesting plan. Board action shall occur within 30 days from the date of the filing of the appeal, or a longer period mutually agreed upon by the board and the person filing the appeal.

(d) If the timber harvesting plan is not approved on appeal to the board, the plan may be found to be in conformance by the director within 10 days from the date of the board action, provided that the plan is brought into full conformance with the rules and regulations of the board and with this chapter. If the director does not act within 25 days or a longer period mutually agreed upon by the director and the person submitting the timber harvesting plan, timber
 operations may commence pursuant to the plan, and all provisions of the plan shall be followed as provided in this chapter.

(e) Upon the request of a responsible agency, the director shall consult with that agency, pursuant to this chapter, but the director, or the director’s designee within the department, shall have the final authority to determine whether a timber harvesting plan is in conformance with the rules and regulations of the board and with this chapter for purposes of approval by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 81.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4582.71.

(a) A timber harvesting plan may not be approved if the appropriate regional water quality control board finds, based on substantial evidence, that the timber operations proposed in the plan will result in a discharge into a watercourse that has been classified as impaired due to sediment pursuant to subsection (d) of Section 303 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, that causes or contributes, to a violation of the regional water quality control plan.

(b) The exercise of a regional water quality control board’s authority pursuant to subdivision (a) may be delegated to the executive officer of that regional water quality control board as long as the executive officer’s determination is subject to review by that regional water quality control board upon request of the person that has submitted the timber harvesting plan or upon motion of that regional water quality control board.

(c) If the appropriate regional water quality control board makes a finding pursuant to subdivision (a), the executive officer of that regional water quality control board shall, before the close of the public comment period under Section 4582.7, notify the director in writing of the finding and advise the director that the plan may not be approved. If the issues that lead to a regional water quality control board’s finding pursuant to subdivision (a) cannot be resolved during the director’s determination period under Section 4582.7 or a longer period that is mutually agreeable to the director and the person that submitted the timber harvesting plan, the director shall deny the timber harvesting plan and return the plan to the person that submitted it. The director shall advise the person that submitted the timber harvesting plan of the reasons why the plan is being returned.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 900, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4582.75.

The rules adopted by the board and the provisions of this chapter shall be the only criteria employed by the director when reviewing timber harvesting plans pursuant to Section 4582.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 900, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4582.8.
